Utah statutes.
13-14b-104.   Audits.

(1)  A supplier may not audit a dealer's records concerning any paid warranty claim that was submitted to the supplier more than one year before the day on which the audit begins, except where an audit of records made within the one-year time period shows fraudulent claims, in which case this provision does not apply.

(2) (a)  After payment or rejection of a warranty claim under Subsection 13-14b-103(2), a supplier may not audit a warranty claim more than once.

(b)  Subsection (2)(a) may not prevent a supplier from requiring additional information from a dealer if an initial audit finds potential errors, fraud, or inconsistencies.



Enacted by Chapter 225, 2003 General Session

